Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1899.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 708(b)(6)(i)(C) of the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, is amended to read:Section 708. Exceptions for public records.* * *(b) Exceptions.--Except as provided in subsections (c) and (d), the following are exempt from access by a requester under this act:123456789101112131415161718192021 * * *(6) (i) The following personal identification information:* * *(C) The home address of a law enforcement officer [or], judge or member of the General Assembly.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1899PN2369 - 2 - 123456789